Illinois, session 104th, HB4143.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 527-20.9 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-20.9 new)7    Sec. 27-20.9. Italian American history study.8    (a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, every public 9elementary school and high school shall include in its 10curriculum a unit of instruction studying the events of 11Italian American history, including the history of Italian 12Americans in the State and the Midwest, as well as the 13contributions of Italian Americans toward advancing civil 14rights from the 19th century onward. These events shall 15include the contributions made by individual Italian Americans 16in government and the arts, humanities, and sciences, as well 17as the contributions of Italian American communities to the 18economic, cultural, social, and political development of the 19United States. The studying of this material shall constitute 20an affirmation by students of their commitment to respect the 21dignity of all races and peoples and to forever eschew every 22form of discrimination in their lives and careers.23    (b) The State Superintendent of Education may prepare and   HB4143- 2 -LRB104 14870 LNS 28014 b1make available to all school boards instructional materials, 2including those established by the Public Broadcasting 3Service, that may be used as guidelines for development of a 4unit of instruction under this Section. However, each school 5board shall itself determine the minimum amount of 6instructional time that qualifies as a unit of instruction 7satisfying the requirements of this Section.8    (c) The regional superintendent of schools shall monitor a 9school district's compliance with this Section's curricular 10requirements during his or her annual compliance visit.11    (d) A school may meet the requirements of this Section 12through an online program or course. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.